Mississippi, session 2026, SB2705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 11-55-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 11-55-7.  (1)  In determining the amount of an award of costs or attorney's fees, the court shall exercise its sound discretion.  When granting an award of costs and attorney's fees, the court shall specifically set forth the reasons for such award and shall consider the following factors, among others, in determining whether to assess attorney's fees and costs and the amount to be assessed: (a)  The extent to which any effort was made to determine the validity of any action, claim or defense before it was asserted, and the time remaining within which the claim or defense could be filed; (b)  The extent of any effort made after the commencement of an action to reduce the number of claims being asserted or to dismiss claims that have been found not to be valid; (c)  The availability of facts to assist in determining the validity of an action, claim or defense; (d)  Whether or not the action was prosecuted or defended, in whole or in part, in bad faith or for improper purpose; (e)  Whether or not issues of fact, determinative of the validity of a party's claim or defense, were reasonably in conflict; (f)  The extent to which the party prevailed with respect to the amount of and number of claims or defenses in controversy; (g)  The extent to which any action, claim or defense was asserted by an attorney or party in a good faith attempt to establish a new theory of law in the state, which purpose was made known to the court at the time of filing; (h)  The amount or conditions of any offer of judgment or settlement in relation to the amount or conditions of the ultimate relief granted by the court; (i)  The extent to which a reasonable effort was made to determine prior to the time of filing of an action or claim that all parties sued or joined were proper parties owing a legally defined duty to any party or parties asserting the claim or action; (j)  The extent of any effort made after the commencement of an action to reduce the number of parties in the action; and (k)  The period of time available to the attorney for the party asserting any defense before such defense was interposed. (2)  In any action in which attorney fees are determined or awarded by the court, there is a strong presumption that a lodestar fee is sufficient and reasonable.  This presumption may be overcome only in a rare and exceptional circumstance with evidence that competent counsel could not otherwise be retained. SECTION 2. The procedure in this section applies only to those actions specified by statute or rule.  Rules of procedure apply to this section except when this section or the statute or rule prescribing this section provides a different procedure. If there is a difference between the time period prescribed in a rule and in this section, this section governs. (a)  Plaintiff's initial pleading shall contain the matters required by the statute or rule prescribing this section or, if none is so required, shall state a cause of action.  All defenses of law or fact shall be contained in defendant's answer which shall be filed within five (5) days after service of process.  If the answer incorporates a counterclaim, plaintiff shall include all defenses of law or fact in his or her answer to the counterclaim and shall serve it within five (5) days after service of the counterclaim.  No other pleadings are permitted. All defensive motions, including motions to quash, shall be heard by the court prior to trial. (b)  Depositions on oral examination may be taken by any party at any time.  Other discovery and admissions may be had only on order of court setting the time for compliance. No discovery postpones the time for trial except for good cause shown or by stipulation of the parties. (c)  If a jury trial is authorized by law, any party may demand it in any pleading or by a separate paper served not later than five (5) days after the action comes to issue. When a jury is in attendance at the close of pleading or the time of demand for jury trial, the action may be tried immediately; otherwise, the court shall order a special venire to be summoned immediately.  If a special venire be summoned, the party demanding the jury shall deposit sufficient money with the clerk to pay the jury fees which shall be taxed as costs if he or she prevails. (d)  Motion for new trial shall be filed and served within five (5) days after verdict, if a jury trial was had, or after entry of judgment, if trial was by the court.  A reserved motion for directed verdict shall be renewed within the period for moving for a new trial. (e)  Notice of appeal shall be filed and served within thirty (30) days from the rendition of the judgment appealed from. SECTION 3. (1)  In an action brought for declaratory relief in state or federal court to determine insurance coverage after the insurer has made a total coverage denial of a claim: (a)  Either party is entitled to the summary procedure provided in Section 2 of this act, and the court shall advance the cause on the calendar. (b)  The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to the named insured, omnibus insured, or named beneficiary under a policy issued by the insurer upon rendition of a declaratory judgment in favor of the named insured, omnibus insured, or named beneficiary.  This right may not be transferred to, assigned to, or acquired in any other manner by anyone other than a named or omnibus insured or a named beneficiary.  A defense offered by an insurer pursuant to a reservation of rights does not constitute a coverage denial of a claim.  Such fees are limited to those incurred in the action brought under this chapter for declaratory relief to determine coverage of insurance issued under Mississippi law. (2)  This section does not apply to any action arising under a residential or commercial property insurance policy. SECTION 4. (1)  Except as provided under Sections 15-1-36 and 11-46-11, all actions founded on negligence shall be commenced within two (2) years next after the cause of such action accrued, and not after, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. (2)  In actions subject to subsection (1) of this section and which involve latent injury or disease, the cause of action does not accrue until the plaintiff has discovered, or by reasonable diligence should have discovered, the injury. SECTION 5. (1)  (a)  An action for bad faith involving a liability insurance claim shall not lie if the insurer tenders the lesser of the policy limits or the amount demanded by the claimant within ninety (90) days after receiving actual notice of a claim which is accompanied by sufficient evidence to support the amount of the claim. (b)  If an insurer does not tender the lesser of the policy limits or the amount demanded by the claimant within the 90-day period provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the existence of the 90-day period and that no bad faith action could lie had the insurer tendered the lesser of policy limits or the amount demanded by the claimant pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section is inadmissible in any action seeking to establish bad faith on the part of the insurer. (c)  If the insurer fails to tender pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section within the 90-day period, any applicable statute of limitations is extended for an additional ninety (90) days. (2)  In any bad-faith action claim against an insurer for bad faith: (a)  Mere negligence alone is insufficient to constitute bad faith. (b)  (i)  The insured, claimant, and representative of the insured or claimant have a duty to act in good faith in furnishing information regarding the claim, in making demands of the insurer, in setting deadlines, and in attempting to settle the claim.  This duty does not create a separate cause of action, but may only be considered pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section. (ii)  In any action for bad faith against an insurer, the trier of fact may consider whether the insured, claimant, or representative of the insured or claimant did not act in good faith pursuant to this paragraph, in which case the trier of fact may reasonably reduce the amount of damages awarded against the insurer. (3)  If two (2) or more third-party claimants have competing claims arising out of a single occurrence, which in total may exceed the available policy limits of one or more of the insured parties who may be liable to the third-party claimants, an insurer is not liable beyond the available policy limits for failure to pay all or any portion of the available policy limits to one or more of the third-party claimants if, within ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the competing claims in excess of the available policy limits, the insurer complies with either subsection (3)(a) or (3)(b) of this section: (a)  The insurer files an interpleader action under the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.  If the claims of the competing third-party claimants are found to be in excess of the policy limits, the third-party claimants are entitled to a prorated share of the policy limits as determined by the trier of fact.  An insurer's interpleader action does not alter or amend the insurer's obligation to defend its insured. (b)  Pursuant to binding arbitration that has been agreed to by the insurer and the third-party claimants, the insurer makes the entire amount of the policy limits available for payment to the competing third-party claimants before a qualified arbitrator agreed to by the insurer and such third-party claimants at the expense of the insurer.  The third-party claimants are entitled to a prorated share of the policy limits as determined by the arbitrator, who must consider the comparative fault, if any, of each third-party claimant, and the total likely outcome at trial based upon the total of the economic and noneconomic damages submitted to the arbitrator for consideration.  A third-party claimant whose claim is resolved by the arbitrator must execute and deliver a general release to the insured party whose claim is resolved by the proceeding. SECTION 6. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Factoring company" means a person who purchases a health care provider's accounts receivable at a discount below the invoice value of such accounts. (b)  "Health care coverage" means any third-party health care or disability services financing arrangement, including, but not limited to, arrangements with entities certified or authorized under federal law or under Mississippi law; state or federal health care benefit programs; workers' compensation; and personal injury protection. (c)  "Health-care provider" shall have the meaning assigned to the term "health-care institution" in Section 41-107-3(c). (d)  "Letter of protection" means any arrangement by which a health care provider renders treatment in exchange for a promise of payment for the claimant's medical expenses from any judgment or settlement of a personal injury or wrongful death action.  The term includes any such arrangement, regardless of whether referred to as a letter of protection. (2)  Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for past or future medical treatment or services in a personal injury or wrongful death action is admissible as provided in this subsection. (a)  Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for past medical treatment or services that have been satisfied is limited to evidence of the amount actually paid, regardless of the source of payment. (b)  Evidence offered to prove the amount necessary to satisfy unpaid charges for incurred medical treatment or services shall include, but is not limited to, evidence as provided in this paragraph. (i)  If the claimant has health care coverage other than Medicare or Medicaid, evidence of the amount which such health care coverage is obligated to pay the health care provider to satisfy the charges for the claimant's incurred medical treatment or services, plus the claimant's share of medical expenses under the insurance contract or regulation. (ii)  If the claimant has health care coverage but obtains treatment under a letter of protection or otherwise does not submit charges for any health care provider's medical treatment or services to health care coverage, evidence of the amount the claimant's health care coverage would pay the health care provider to satisfy the past unpaid medical charges under the insurance contract or regulation, plus the claimant's share of medical expenses under the insurance contract or regulation, had the claimant obtained medical services or treatment pursuant to the health care coverage. (iii)  If the claimant does not have health care coverage or has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, evidence of one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect on the date of the claimant's incurred medical treatment or services, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a service, one hundred seventy percent (170%) of the applicable State Medicaid rate. (iv)  If the claimant obtains medical treatment or services under a letter of protection and the health care provider subsequently transfers the right to receive payment under the letter of protection to a third party, evidence of the amount the third party paid or agreed to pay the health care provider in exchange for the right to receive payment pursuant to the letter of protection. (v)  Any evidence of reasonable amounts billed to the claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically necessary services provided to the claimant. (c)  Evidence offered to prove the amount of damages for any future medical treatment or services the claimant will receive shall include, but is not limited to, evidence as provided in this paragraph. (i)  If the claimant has health care coverage other than Medicare or Medicaid, or is eligible for any such health care coverage, evidence of the amount for which the future charges of health care providers could be satisfied if submitted to such health care coverage, plus the claimant's share of medical expenses under the insurance contract or regulation. (ii)  If the claimant does not have health care coverage or has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, or is eligible for such health care coverage, evidence of one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect at the time of trial for the medical treatment or services the claimant will receive, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a service, one hundred seventy percent (170%) of the applicable Sof this State Medicaid rate. (iii)  Any evidence of reasonable future amounts to be billed to the claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically necessary services. (d)  This subsection does not impose an affirmative duty upon any party to seek a reduction in billed charges to which the party is not contractually entitled. (e)  Individual contracts between providers and authorized commercial insurers or authorized health maintenance organizations are not subject to discovery or disclosure and are not admissible into evidence. (3)  In a personal injury or wrongful death action, as a condition precedent to asserting any claim for medical expenses for treatment rendered under a letter of protection, the claimant must disclose: (a)  A copy of the letter of protection. (b)  All billings for the claimant's medical expenses, which must be itemized and, to the extent applicable, coded according to: (i)  For health care providers billing at the provider level, the American Medical Association's Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), or the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS), in effect on the date the services were rendered. (ii)  For health care providers billing at the facility level for expenses incurred in a clinical or outpatient setting, including when billing through an Ambulatory Payment Classification (APC) or Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Grouping (EAPG), the International Classification of Diseases (ICD) diagnosis code and, if applicable, the American Medical Association's Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), in effect on the date the services were rendered. (iii)  For health care providers billing at the facility level for expenses incurred in an inpatient setting, including when billing through a Diagnosis Related Group (DRG), the International Classification of Diseases (ICD) diagnosis and procedure codes in effect on the date in which the claimant is discharged. (c)  If the health care provider sells the accounts receivable for the claimant's medical expenses to a factoring company or other third party: (i)  The name of the factoring company or other third party who purchased such accounts. (ii)  The dollar amount for which the factoring company or other third party purchased such accounts, including any discount provided below the invoice amount. (d)  Whether the claimant, at the time medical treatment was rendered, had health care coverage and, if so, the identity of such coverage. (e)  Whether the claimant was referred for treatment under a letter of protection and, if so, the identity of the person who made the referral.  If the referral is made by the claimant's attorney, disclosure of the referral is permitted, and evidence of such referral is admissible.  Moreover, in such situation, the financial relationship between a law firm and a medical provider, including the number of referrals, frequency, and financial benefit obtained, is relevant to the issue of the bias of a testifying medical provider. (4)  The damages that may be recovered by a claimant in a personal injury or wrongful death action for the reasonable and necessary cost or value of medical care rendered may not include any amount in excess of the evidence of medical treatment and services expenses admitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, and also may not exceed the sum of the following: (a)  Amounts actually paid by or on behalf of the claimant to a health care provider who rendered medical treatment or services; (b)  Amounts necessary to satisfy charges for medical treatment or services that are due and owing but at the time of trial are not yet satisfied; and (c)  Amounts necessary to provide for any reasonable and necessary medical treatment or services the claimant will receive in the future. SECTION 7. (1)  As used in this section, the following terms have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Multifamily residential property" means a residential building, or group of residential buildings, such as apartments, townhouses, or condominiums, consisting of at least five (5) dwelling units on a particular parcel. (b)  "Parcel" means real property for which a distinct parcel identification number is assigned to the property by the property appraiser for the county in which the property is located. (c)  "Proper crime deterrence and safety training" means training which trains and familiarizes employees with the security principles, devices, measures, and standards set forth under subsection (2)(a) of this section. (2)  The owner or principal operator of a multifamily residential property which substantially implements the following security measures on that property has a presumption against liability in connection with criminal acts that occur on the premises which are committed by third parties who are not employees or agents of the owner or operator: (a)  (i)  A security camera system at points of entry and exit which records, and maintains as retrievable for at least thirty (30) days, video footage to assist in offender identification and apprehension. (ii)  A lighted parking lot illuminated at an intensity of at least an average of 1.8 foot-candles per square foot at eighteen (18) inches above the surface from dusk until dawn or controlled by photocell or any similar electronic device that provides light from dusk until dawn. (iii)  Lighting in walkways, laundry rooms, common areas, and porches.  Such lighting must be illuminated from dusk until dawn or controlled by photocell or any similar electronic device that provides light from dusk until dawn. (iv)  At least a one-inch deadbolt in each dwelling unit door. (v)  A locking device on each window, each exterior sliding door, and any other doors not used for community purposes. (vi)  Locked gates with key or fob access along pool fence areas. (vii)  A peephole or door viewer on each dwelling unit door that does not include a window or that does not have a window next to the door. (b)  By January 1, 2027, the owner or principal operator of a multifamily residential property provides proper crime deterrence and safety training to its current employees.  After January 1, 2027, the owner or principal operator must provide such training to an employee within sixty (60) days after his hire date for purposes of this subsection (2)(b). (3)  (a)  For purposes of establishing the presumption against liability under subsection (2) of this section, the burden of proof is on the owner or principal operator to demonstrate that the owner or principal operator has substantially implemented the security measures specified in subsection (2) of this section. (b)  The court may determine that a deviation from the security principles, devices, measures, and standards required under subsection (2)(a) of this section is in substantial compliance with such standards. SECTION 8.  Section 11-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 11-7-15.  (1)  In all actions hereafter brought for personal injuries, or where such injuries have resulted in death, or for injury to property, the fact that the person injured, or the owner of the property, or person having control over the property may have been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery, but damages shall be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to the person injured, or the owner of the property, or the person having control over the property, subject to subsection (2) of this section. (2)  In a negligence action to which this section applies other than an action brought for personal injuries, or where such injuries have resulted in death, any party found to be greater than fifty percent (50%) at fault for his or her own harm may not recover any damages. SECTION 9. This act shall not be construed to impair any right under an insurance contract in effect on or before the effective date of this act.  To the extent that this act affects a right under an insurance contract, this act applies to an insurance contract issued or renewed after the effective date of this act. SECTION 10.  Except as otherwise expressly provided in this act, this act shall apply to causes of action filed after the effective date of this act. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.